Utah statutes.
35A-3-507.   Request for proposals from civic organizations -- Contract requirements.

(1) (a)  Before October 1, 1997, the director shall issue a request for proposals.  Interested civic organizations may submit proposals for the purpose of contracting with the division for the provision of social capital.

(b)  In cooperation with the coalition described in Section 35A-3-510, the department shall establish by rule:

(i)  specifications for proposals;

(ii)  deadlines for submissions;

(iii)  contents of proposals;

(iv)  the criteria upon which proposals will be accepted; and

(v)  the amount of available funding.

(2) Within appropriations from the Legislature the director may enter into one or more contracts with civic organizations, which shall at least include:

(a)  the funding, if any, to be provided to the civic organization by the division;

(b)  the geographical boundary within which the civic organization is to provide services and supports to individuals referred by the division;

(c)  a description of the services and supports to be provided by the civic organization to clients;

(d)  the performance monitoring system to be used by the civic organization to evaluate the effects of the services and supports that it provides; and

(e)  other provisions as the division and civic organization consider appropriate.

(3) (a)  A contract between the division and a civic organization under this section is for a defined period of time and a fixed funding amount.

(b)  If a contract provides public funds, the civic organization will be required to comply with all applicable state and federal law with respect to those funds, which may include audit, recordkeeping, and financial accounting requirements.

(4)  The services and supports provided by civic organizations under this section do not include eligibility determinations, cash assistance, food coupons, or quality assurance related to these functions.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 174, 1997 General Session

